Louisiana, session 2026, SB178.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3215(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3215. Louisiana State University system
The Louisiana State University system is composed of the institutions under
the supervision and management of the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College as follows:
* * *
(8) The Center for Agricultural Sciences and Rural Development, generally
known as the Louisiana State University Agricultural Center, which administers
shall administer the agricultural extension and research programs of the board
throughout the state. The center shall also be responsible for conducting river water
research and agricultural youth development and education programs, including FFA
and 4-H.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-372 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 178
* * *